Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-304.04
Transportation of railroad carrier employees; license; application; fee; issuance; conditions; renewal; fee; failure to comply; effect; commission; authority.

(1) Any motor carrier operating in this state engaged in the intrastate transportation for hire of employees of a railroad carrier engaged in interstate commerce to or from their work locations shall apply to the commission for a license prior to transporting such employees in intrastate commerce. A license shall be issued by the commission to any qualified applicant upon payment of a license fee of two hundred fifty dollars and receipt of a completed application in which the principal place of business of the applicant in the State of Nebraska is identified and the applicant agrees and affirms to perform the service in conformance with section 75-307 and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission relating to driver qualifications, equipment, operating standards, and record keeping. Otherwise the application shall be denied. Applications for initial and renewal licenses shall be on forms prescribed by the commission. A license issued under this section shall be valid for one year and may be renewed annually for a fee of two hundred fifty dollars. A license may be suspended or revoked by the commission after notice and hearing for failure to comply with section 75-307, and any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under this section, or any lawful order of the commission.

(2) Any person who applies for a license pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of section 75-307. The commission shall have no authority to regulate the rates of any motor carrier who is issued a license under this section.

Laws 2020, LB461, § 9.